src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-s2x30_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - skjóla: # 
    skjóla+V+Inf: skjóla
    skjóla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [skjólir, skjólar]
    skjóla+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [skjólaði, skjólti]
    skjóla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [skjóltu, skjólaðu]
    skjóla+V+Sup: [skjólt, skjólað]
    skjóla+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [skjóltur, skjólaður]
